Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.630

Youth agencies—Establishment authorized.

Any city, town, or county may establish a youth agency to investigate, advise and act on, within the powers of that municipality, problems relating to the youth of that community, including employment, educational, economic and recreational opportunities, juvenile delinquency and dependency, and other youth problems and activities as that municipality may determine. Any city, town, or county may contract with any other city, town, or county to jointly establish such a youth agency.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 84 s 5.]